Wisconsin, session 2025, SB870.
do enact as follows:SB870,11Section 1. 196.374 (1) (gm) of the statutes is created to read:SB870,2,32196.374 (1) (gm) “Low-income household” has the meaning given in s. 16.957 3(1) (m).SB870,24Section 2. 196.374 (2) (a) 2. f. of the statutes is created to read:SB870,2,125196.374 (2) (a) 2. f. Components, in coordination with the weatherization 6assistance program administered by the department of administration under s. 716.26, to promote energy efficiency and renewable energy measures for low-income 8households in this state and initiatives and market strategies to address the energy 9needs and decrease the energy burden of low-income households. The commission 10shall ensure that not less than 25 percent of the moneys energy utilities are 11required to spend under subd. 1. or sub. (3) (b) 2. is spent annually on programs 12under this subd. 2. f.SB870,313Section 3. 196.374 (3) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB870,3,214196.374 (3) (b) 1. At least every 4 years, after notice and opportunity to be 15heard, the commission shall, by order, evaluate the energy efficiency and renewable 16resource programs under sub. (2) (a) 1., (b) 1. and 2., and (c) and ordered programs 17and set or revise goals, priorities, and measurable targets for the programs. The 18commission shall give priority to programs that moderate the growth in electric and 19natural gas demand and usage, facilitate markets and assist market providers to 20achieve higher levels of energy efficiency, promote energy reliability and adequacy, 21promote energy efficiency and renewable energy measures for low-income 1households, avoid adverse environmental impacts from the use of energy, and 2promote rural economic development.SB870,43Section 4. 196.374 (3) (f) 5. of the statutes is created to read:SB870,3,64196.374 (3) (f) 5. Minimum requirements for energy efficiency and renewable 5energy measures under sub. (2) (a) 2. f. for low-income households and eligibility 6requirements for programs for low-income households.SB870,3,77